Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2436
Reinstatement of operating permit; conditions; fee.

(1) Any person who held an operating permit on December 31, 2005, and whose permit expired pursuant to rules and regulations may file a request for reinstatement of the operating permit subject to the following conditions:

(a) The request must be filed on or before December 31, 2007;

(b) The person shall certify that the livestock operation is in compliance with the operating permit as it existed on the date the operating permit expired; and

(c) The request shall be accompanied by a twenty-five-dollar nonrefundable filing fee.

(2) The department shall, upon receipt of a complete and timely request for reinstatement, reinstate the permit with the same conditions as existed when the permit expired.

Laws 2006, LB 975, § 16.